Rhode Island, session 2025, HB5965.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Chapter 44-5 of the General Laws entitled "Levy and Assessment of Local
Taxes" is hereby amended by adding thereto the following section:
44-5-89. Cranston homestead exemption.
(a) The city council of the city of Cranston is authorized to annually fix the amount, if any,
of a homestead exemption, with respect to assessed value, from local taxation on taxable real
property used for residential purposes defined as residential use in the city of Cranston, and to grant
homestead exemptions to the owner, or owners, of residential real estate, in an amount not to exceed
up to twenty percent (20%) of the assessed value. The exemption shall apply to property used
exclusively for residential purposes, and improved with a dwelling containing less than three (3)
units, or real property used for residential use. The prorated amount shall be the percentage of
square feet of the parcel used for residential purposes, multiplied by the percentage of the
homestead exemption. In order to determine compliance with the homestead exemption as outlined
in this section, the city council shall provide, by resolution or ordinance, rules and regulations
governing eligibility for the exemption established by this section.
(b) In the event property granted an exemption under this section is sold or transferred
during the year for which the exemption is claimed, the city council may provide for a proration of
the homestead exemption in cases where title to property passes from those entitled to claim an
exemption to those who are not entitled to claim an exemption.

SECTION 2. This act shall take effect on December 31, 2025.
========
LC002005
========
LC002005 - Page 2 of 3